Nebraska, session 109, LB110.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, intimate examination means
the manual examination of a patient's breast or an internal pelvic, prostate,
or rectal examination but does not include a visual examination of a patient's
breast or any body part associated with an internal pelvic, prostate, or rectal
examination.
(2) The Legislature finds and declares that:
(a) The ethical principle of informed consent in medical practice is
critical to the trust a patient places in a health care provider;
(b) A patient has the rational expectation to have control over the
patient's medical decisions; and
(c) The parts of the body subject to an intimate examination are protected
under state law and deserve similar protection in medical practice.
(3) A health care provider licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act
shall not perform an intimate examination on a patient who is anesthetized or
unconscious in a health care facility as defined in section 71-413 without
prior written consent unless:
(a) An individual authorized to make health care decisions for the patient
has given written consent for the examination;
(b) The examination is necessary for emergency diagnostic or emergency
treatment purposes; or
(c) A court orders the performance of the examination for the collection
of evidence.
(4) If an intimate examination is performed on an unconscious or
anesthetized patient pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the patient
shall be notified in writing prior to discharge of such patient from the health
care facility.
(5) A health care provider who violates subsection (3) of this section is
subject to discipline under the Uniform Credentialing Act.
-1-